Maryland, session 2026, SB0850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–222.
(a) (1) Subject to review and approval by the Commission, each electric
company, each gas company other than a gas company subject to § 4–207(a) of this article,
the Department, and, if required in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, each
midsize electric cooperative shall develop and implement programs and services in
accordance with §§ 7–223, 7–224, and 7–225 of this subtitle to encourage and promote the
efficient use and conservation of energy, demand response, and beneficial electrification by
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0850*

SENATE BILL 850
consumers, electric companies, gas companies, and the Department in support of the
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12
of the Environment Article.
(2) ANY PROGRAM OR SERVICE DEVELOPED BY AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY OR A GAS COMPANY, OTHER THAN A GAS COMPANY SUBJECT TO § 4–207(A)
OF THIS ARTICLE, AND APPROVED BY THE COMMISSION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE DEMONSTRABLE BILL SAVINGS TO RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMERS.
(b) As directed by the Commission, each gas company subject to § 4–207(a) of this
article, each municipal electric or gas utility, each small rural electric cooperative, and, if
required in accordance with subsection (c) of this section, each midsize electric cooperative
shall include energy efficiency and conservation, demand response, and beneficial
electrification programs or services THAT INCLUDE DEMONSTRABLE BILL SAVINGS TO
RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS as part of their service to their customers.
(c) (1) In accordance with this subsection, each midsize electric cooperative
shall be subject to either subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section.
(2) Each midsize electric cooperative shall offer programs and services to
customers in accordance with:
(i) subsection (b) of this section through December 31, 2026; and
(ii) on or after January 1, 2027, and as the Commission directs,
either subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section.
(3) Not later than October 1, 2025, the Commission shall determine if it is
in the public interest for a midsize electric cooperative to offer programs and services to
customers in accordance with subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section starting
January 1, 2027, and for all subsequent years.
(4) Each midsize electric cooperative shall provide the following
information to the Commission to assist in making a determination under paragraph (3) of
this subsection:
(i) anticipated costs and bill impacts;
(ii) a description of the anticipated program offerings;
(iii) the anticipated cost–effectiveness of the residential, commercial,
and industrial sector subportfolios based on the cost–effectiveness tests in § 7–225(d)(3)(i)
of this subtitle;

SENATE BILL 850 3
(iv) the anticipated electricity savings and greenhouse gas emissions
reductions; and
(v) any other information the Commission requires.
(5) The information provided to the Commission under paragraph (4) of
this subsection shall be based on a plan to offer programs and services to customers that
complies with the requirements of an electric company subject to subsection (a) of this
section for the 3–year program cycle starting January 1, 2027.
(6) When making a public interest determination under paragraph (3) of
this subsection the Commission, at a minimum, shall consider the requirements under §
7–225(d)(3) of this subtitle that are considered when approving a plan of an electric
company that is subject to subsection (a) of this section.
(7) Starting October 1, 2025, if the Commission determines that it is in the
public interest for a midsize electric cooperative to be subject to subsection (a) of this
section, the midsize electric cooperative shall comply with all requirements of an electric
company subject to subsection (a) of this section for program cycles starting on and after
January 1, 2027.
(8) On or before March 1 each year, starting in 2026, each midsize electric
cooperative directed by the Commission to include programs or services under subsection
(b) of this section shall submit to the Commission a report quantifying the gains in energy
efficiency and reductions in greenhouse gas emissions achieved during the previous year.
(d) The Commission shall encourage and promote the efficient use and
conservation of energy in support of the greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals and
targets required under Title 2, Subtitle 12 of the Environment Article, established by the
Commission under § 7–223(b) of this subtitle, and specified in § 7–224(a)(2) of this subtitle
by:
(1) requiring each electric company and gas company to establish any
program or service that:
(I) the Commission determines to be appropriate and cost–effective;
(II) DEMONSTRABLY REDUCES RESIDENTIAL CUSTOMER BILLS;
AND
(III) USES DEMAND REDUCTION OR OTHER COST CONTAINMENT
MECHANISMS TO REDUCE ENERGY CONSUMPTION AND LOWER RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMER BILLS;
(2) adopting rate–making policies that provide, through a surcharge line
item on customer bills:

SENATE BILL 850
(i) full cost recovery of reasonably incurred costs for programs and
services established under item (1) of this subsection, including full recovery on a current
basis on or before January 1, 2028;
(ii) on or before December 31, [2032] 2040, the elimination of any
unpaid costs and unamortized costs that:
1. A. existed on December 31, 2024; or
B. were incurred before January 1, 2028; and
2. were accrued for the purpose of achieving statutory
targets for annual incremental gross energy savings;
(iii) compensation for any unpaid costs and unamortized costs under
item (ii) of this item at not more than each electric company’s and each gas company’s
average cost of outstanding debt; and
(iv) reasonable financial performance incentives and penalties for
investor–owned electric companies and gas companies, as appropriate; and
(3) ensuring that adoption of electric customer choice under Subtitle 5 of
this title and gas customer choice under Subtitle 6 of this title does not adversely impact
these goals and targets.
(e) The Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric company
and each gas company subject to subsection (a) of this section that has submitted to the
Commission, on or before July 1, 2024, a plan for achieving electricity or gas savings and
demand reduction targets to disclose the following information in a form and format readily
understandable to the average customer:
(1) that the surcharge imposed in accordance with subsection (d) of this
section includes the cost of paying down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs that were
accrued over time by programs and services required by the Commission dating back to
2008; and
(2) the period of time that the surcharge will include excess charges to pay
down the unpaid costs and unamortized costs.
(F) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH, BY
ORDER OR REGULATION, CAPS OR LIMIT ASSESSMENTS TO RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMERS UNDER THIS SECTION IN ORDER TO REDUCE COSTS TO RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMERS.
7–223.

SENATE BILL 850 5
(a) On or before January 1, 2025, and on or before January 1 every 3 years,
starting in 2027, the Commission shall, by regulation or order, require each electric
company and each gas company subject to § 7–222(a) of this subtitle to develop and
implement a plan that:
(1) covers appropriate ratepayer classes;
(2) starting in 2027, covers a 3–year program cycle; [and]
(3) achieves the greenhouse gas emissions reduction target established for
the electric company or gas company under subsection (b) of this section through
cost–effective energy efficiency and conservation programs and services, demand response
programs and services, and beneficial electrification programs and services; AND
(4) ACHIEVES DEMONSTRABLE SAVINGS TO RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMERS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before July 1, 2027, the
Public Service Commission shall report to the Senate Education, Energy, and the
Environment Committee and the House Environment and Transportation Committee, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, on the implementation of this
Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.